Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3202
Authority; beneficiaries.

The beneficiaries of the authority shall be the taxing authorities which held or owned tax bills against the respective parcels of real estate sold to the authority at the sheriff's foreclosure sale included in the judgment of the court, and their respective interests in each parcel of real estate shall be to the extent and in the proportion and according to the priorities determined by the court on the basis of the principal amount of the judgment against each such parcel of real estate.

Laws 1973, LB 73, § 2.